Illinois, session 104th, HB359.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Methamphetamine Precursor Tracking Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 649/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Methamphetamine Precursor Tracking Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-670, eff. 1-19-12.)